Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 1. Insurance Required.

Sec. 28.22.010.
Motor vehicle liability policy. [Repealed, § 17 ch 70 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 28.22.011.
Motor vehicle liability insurance required; exemptions.

The operator or owner of a motor vehicle subject to registration under AS

28.10.011

when driven on a highway, vehicular way or area, or on other public property in the state, shall be insured under a motor vehicle liability policy that complies with this chapter or a certificate of self-insurance that complies with AS

28.20.400

unless

the motor vehicle is being driven or moved on a highway, vehicular way, or a public parking place in the state that is not connected by a land highway or vehicular way to

the land-connected state highway system, or

a highway or vehicular way with an average daily traffic volume greater than 499; and

the operator has not been cited within the preceding five years for a traffic law violation with a demerit point value of six or more on the point schedule determined under regulations adopted by the department under AS

28.15.221

.

The department shall annually publish a list of areas that meet the requirements of (a)(1) of this section. This list shall be available for public inspection at each office of the department.

In this section, “operator” does not include

an employee who operates, during the course and within the scope of employment, a motor vehicle that is owned or leased by the operator’s employer; or

an emergency service volunteer who operates, during the course and within the scope of responding to an emergency, a motor vehicle not owned by the volunteer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1989; am § 79 ch 63 SLA 1993)

Sec. 28.22.019.
Proof of insurance to be exhibited on demand; penalty.

A person shall have proof of motor vehicle liability insurance in the person’s immediate possession at all times when driving a motor vehicle, and shall present the proof for inspection upon the demand of a peace officer or other authorized representative of the Department of Public Safety. A person may display the proof on a mobile electronic device. However, a person charged with violating this section may not be convicted if the person produces in court or in the office of the arresting or citing officer proof of motor vehicle liability insurance previously issued to the person that was valid at the time of the person’s arrest or citation.

A municipality may adopt an ordinance

requiring a person to display a decal on the person’s motor vehicle indicating compliance with (a) of this section; or

that is substantially similar to (a) of this section and may impose a penalty for violating the ordinance as provided under AS

29.25.070

.

A person convicted under this section is guilty of an infraction and shall be sentenced to pay a mandatory fine of $500.

Displaying proof of motor vehicle liability insurance on a mobile electronic device under this section does not constitute consent for a peace officer or other authorized representative of the Department of Public Safety to access other contents of the mobile electronic device.

In this section, “proof” means

a copy of the insurance policy or certificate of self-insurance that is in effect;

a printed card or electronic certification from an insurance company, insurance agent, insurance broker, or surplus lines broker that a policy that complies with AS

28.22.011

is in effect; or

the display on a mobile electronic device of verification from an insurance company, insurance agent, insurance broker, or surplus lines broker that a policy that complies with AS

28.22.011

is in effect.

History.

(§ 20 ch 60 SLA 2002; am § 3 ch 74 SLA 2008; am § 21 ch 20 SLA 2011; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 24 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (c) was enacted as (d) and relettered in 2008.

Subsection (d) was enacted as (e) and relettered in 2013.

Subsection (e) was relettered in 2008 and 2013 to keep the definitions at the end of the section.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective July 1, 2011, in (c), substituted “guilty of an infraction and shall be sentenced to pay a mandatory fine of $500” for “guilty of a class B misdemeanor and may be punished as provided in AS 12.55, except that a fine of at least $500 must be imposed”.

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in (a), inserted the second sentence; added (d)(3) (now (e)(3)), and made related changes; added (e) (now (d)).

Sec. 28.22.020.
Policy provisions that are implied. [Repealed, § 17, ch 70 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 28.22.021.
Requirement of proof of motor vehicle liability insurance.

The owner or operator of a motor vehicle required to have motor vehicle liability insurance that complies with this chapter or a certificate of self-insurance that complies with AS

28.20.400

, shall show proof of this insurance when that person is involved in an accident that results in bodily injury to or death of a person, or damage to the property of a person exceeding $501.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1989; am § 17 ch 6 FSSLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For safety responsibility, see 2 AAC 90, art. 3.

For mandatory auto insurance, see 2 AAC 90, art. 7.

Sec. 28.22.030.
Excess or additional coverage. [Repealed, § 17 ch 70 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 28.22.031.
Method of proof of motor vehicle liability insurance.

A person involved in an accident who is required under AS

28.22.021

to prove that a motor vehicle liability policy or a certificate of self-insurance was in effect shall, within 15 days after the accident,

present a copy of the insurance policy, certificate, bond, or insurance binder that was in effect at the time of the accident to the department for inspection;

provide the department with written certification from an insurance company, insurance agent, insurance broker or surplus lines broker confirming that a valid motor vehicle liability policy issued in conformity with this chapter was in effect at the time of the accident; or

advise the department in writing that a certificate of self-insurance was in effect at the time of the accident.

The department shall develop and implement a program to check the veracity of the documents filed for proof under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1989)

Administrative Code. —

For mandatory auto insurance, see 2 AAC 90, art. 7.

Sec. 28.22.040.
Proration. [Repealed, § 17 ch 70 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 28.22.041.
Administrative suspension of drivers’ licenses.

Except as provided in (h) of this section, if a person fails to provide proof required under AS

28.22.021

and

28.22.031

, the department shall suspend the driver’s license of that person for the following periods:

not less than 90 days if, within the preceding 10 years, the person has not had a driver’s license suspended for violation of AS

28.22.011

or former AS

28.22.200

;

not less than one year if, within the preceding 10 years, the person has had a driver’s license suspended one or more times for violation of AS

28.22.011

or former AS

28.22.200

.

The suspension shall be consecutive to any other suspension required by law or imposed by a court.

The department may grant limited license privileges only for medical care or for work purposes to a person whose license has been suspended under this section if

the person has filed proof of financial responsibility for the future as required by AS

28.22.061

;

the person’s license has not been suspended two or more times under this section or former AS

28.22.240

in the preceding 10 years;

the department determines that the person’s or the person’s dependent’s medical care needs cannot be met without severe hardship or the person’s ability to earn a livelihood would be severely impaired unless a limited license privilege is granted; and

the department determines that a limitation can be placed on the license that will enable the person or the person’s dependent to receive medical care or the person to earn a livelihood without excessive danger to the public.

When imposing a limitation under this section the department shall

require the surrender of the driver’s license; and

issue to the licensee a certificate valid for the duration of the limitation.

After the termination of a limitation as shown on the certificate issued under (d) of this section, the license of a person on whom a limitation was imposed is suspended until the person receives a new license under AS

28.15.211(c)

.

The department shall notify the licensee that the suspension becomes effective 30 days from the date of the notice and that the licensee has the right, within the 30-day period, to make an oral or written answer controverting any point or issue, or to present evidence and arguments for the consideration of the department. Notwithstanding AS

28.05.121

, the department shall provide this notice to the address that appears to be the most recently provided from among the following:

the address the department has for the person;

the address shown on the report of the accident.

Upon receipt of an oral or written answer from the licensee the department shall make findings on the matter under consideration within 15 days and shall notify the person involved of its decision in writing by certified or registered mail. If the department’s decision is to sustain an action against the licensee’s driver’s license, the department shall notify the licensee of the opportunity for a hearing under AS

28.05.121

—

28.05.141

. Suspension of a person’s license is stayed until final disposition of the hearing under this section.

Subsection (a) does not apply to a person who is required to provide proof under AS

28.22.021

if the person

is involved in an accident that results in property damage of less than $2,000 and the damage occurs only to the property of the person required to show proof of insurance;

not later than 15 days after the accident, provides proof of motor vehicle liability insurance that complies with this chapter or a certificate of self-insurance that complies with AS

28.20.400

to the department; and

establishes by a preponderance of the evidence that the failure to have in effect motor vehicle liability insurance or to self-insure as required by this chapter at the time of the accident was due to circumstances beyond the control of the person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 1992; am § 18 ch 6 FSSLA 1996; am § 4 ch 74 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For safety responsibility, see 2 AAC 90, art. 3.

For mandatory auto insurance, see 2 AAC 90, art. 7.

For hearings, see 2 AAC 93, art. 1.

For definitions, see 2 AAC 93, art. 2.

Sec. 28.22.050.
Requirements of policy. [Repealed, § 17 ch 70 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 28.22.051.
Falsification of information.

A person who, with criminal negligence as defined in AS

11.81.900

, provides false information required under AS

28.22.021

—

28.22.041

is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1989)

Sec. 28.22.061.
Proof for the future.

A person whose license is suspended under AS

28.22.041

shall file proof of financial responsibility for the future under AS 28.20 before full driving privileges may be restored or limited license privileges are granted under AS

28.22.041(c)

.

A filing of proof of financial responsibility under AS 28.20 shall be required for a period of three years following expiration of the suspension of license under AS

28.22.041

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1989)